District of Columbia statutes.
2-1936

Phased implementation.

(a)

This subchapter shall apply on June 19, 2004 to:

(1)

Department of Health;

(2)

Department of Human Services;

(3)

Department of Employment Services;

(4)

Metropolitan Police Department;

(5)

District of Columbia Public School System;

(6)

Office of Planning;

(7)

Fire and Emergency Medical Services; and

(8)

Office of Human Rights.

(b)

This subchapter shall apply as of October 1, 2004 to:

(1)

Department of Housing and Community Development;

(2)

Department of Mental Health;

(3)

Department of Motor Vehicles;

(4)

Child and Family Services Agency;

(5)

Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Administration; and

(6)

Department of Consumer and Regulatory Affairs.

(c)

This subchapter shall apply as of October 1, 2005, to:

(1)

Department of Parks and Recreation;

(2)

Office on Aging;

(3)

District of Columbia Public Library;

(4)

Office of Personnel;

(5)

Office of Contracting and Procurement;

(6)

Department of Corrections;

(7)

Department of Public Works; and

(8)

Office of Tax and Revenue.

(d)

This subchapter shall apply as of October 1, 2006 to all covered entities.

June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-167, § 7, 51 DCR 4688
This section is referenced in § 2-1932.